Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2799.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 37A O.S. 2021, Section 6-103, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 200, O.S.L. 2023 (37A O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 6-103), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6-103. A. No retail spirits licensee shall:
1. Purchase or receive any alcoholic beverage other than from a
wine and spirits wholesaler, beer distributor, winery or small
brewer self-distribution licensee who elects to self-distribute;
2. Suffer or permit any retail container to be opened, or any
alcoholic beverage to be consumed on the licensed premises, except
when serving samples as authorized by Section 2-109 of this title or
otherwise permitted by law; provided, the licensee shall not permit
ENGR. H. B. NO. 2799 Page 1

any alcoholic beverage content or retail container unsealed in
connection with sampling authorized by Section 2-109 of this title
to remain on the licensed premises at the close of business on that
day, excluding spirits;
3. Sell any alcoholic beverages at any hour other than between
the hours of 8:00 a.m. and midnight Monday through Saturday, and
shall not be permitted to be open on Thanksgiving Day or Christmas
Day; provided, a county may, pursuant to the provisions of
subsections B and C of Section 3-124 of this title, elect to allow
such sales between the hours of noon and midnight on Sunday. Retail
spirits licensees shall be permitted to sell alcoholic beverages on
the day of any General, Primary, Runoff Primary or Special Election
whether on a national, state, county or city election, provided that
the election day does not occur on any day on which such sales are
otherwise prohibited by law;
4. Sell spirits in a city or town, unless such city or town has
a population in excess of two hundred (200) according to the latest
Federal Decennial Census;
5. Sell any alcoholic beverage on credit; provided, that
acceptance by a licensee of a cash or debit card or a nationally
recognized credit card in lieu of actual cash payment does not
constitute the extension of credit; provided, further, as used in
this section:

ENGR. H. B. NO. 2799 Page 2

a. "cash or debit card" means any instrument or device
whether known as a debit card or by any other name,
issued with or without fee by an issuer for the use of
the cardholder in depositing, obtaining or
transferring funds from a consumer banking electronic
facility, and
b. "nationally recognized credit card" means any
instrument or device, whether known as a credit card,
credit plate, charge plate or by any other name,
issued with or without fee by an issuer for the use of
the cardholder in obtaining money, goods, services or
anything else of value on credit which is accepted by
over one hundred retail locations;
6. 5. Offer or furnish any prize, premium, gift or similar
inducement to a consumer in connection with the sale of alcoholic
beverages, except that goods or merchandise included by the
manufacturer in packaging with alcoholic beverages or for packaging
with alcoholic beverages shall not be included in this prohibition,
but no wholesaler or retailer shall sell any alcoholic beverage
prepackaged with other goods or merchandise at a price which is
greater than the price at which the alcoholic beverage alone is
sold; provided, it shall not be considered inducement or a premium
for a retail spirits licensee to have an advertised price posted
higher online than the shelf price on the licensed premises; or
ENGR. H. B. NO. 2799 Page 3

7. 6. Pay for alcoholic beverages by a check or draft which is
dishonored by the drawee when presented to such drawee for payment;
and the ABLE Commission may cancel or suspend the license of any
retailer who has given a check or draft, as maker or endorser, which
is so dishonored upon presentation.
B. No retail spirits licensee shall permit any person under
twenty-one (21) years of age to enter into or remain within or about
the licensed premises unless accompanied by the person's parent or
legal guardian; provided, however, this restriction shall not apply
to an employee of a licensed beer distributor or wine and spirits
wholesaler who:
1. Is at least eighteen (18) years of age;
2. Is accompanied by a coworker at least twenty-one (21) years
of age; and
3. Enters for the sole purpose of merchandising or delivering
product to the licensee in the normal course of business.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.







ENGR. H. B. NO. 2799 Page 4

Passed the House of Representatives the 13th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _____day of __________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate
















ENGR. H. B. NO. 2799 Page 5